Utah statutes.
26A-1-127.   Surge capacity, surveillance, and community outreach plan.

(1)  In addition to the duties listed in Section 26A-1-114, a local health department shall develop and implement a locally appropriate plan, in coordination with appropriate local, state, and federal partners, to:

(a)  investigate disease outbreaks;

(b)  expand outreach and education efforts to employers, schools, and community organizations; and

(c)  expand local capacity to respond to disasters or disease outbreaks.

(2)  The plan required by Subsection (1) shall include as a minimum, details on how the local health department will maintain, train, and strengthen:

(a)  the Medical Reserve Corps authorized by Section 26A-1-126;

(b)  disease surveillance systems;

(c)  disease outbreak management systems to respond to communicable and food borne illness; and

(d)  emergency preparation and response plans to address infrastructure capacity and outreach and training to community partners.

